Oklahoma, session 2026, SB507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-126 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Beginning January 31, 2026, and on the last day of the month


following each fiscal year quarter, each school district in this


state shall electronically submit to the Governor, the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives a report detailing all federal funds received by the


school district for that quarter. The report shall include the


source of funds, the intended purpose of the funds, and how the


school district expended the funds.

Req. No. 311 Page 1


B. The report required by subsection A of this section shall be


posted on the school district’s website with ten (10) days of the


submission required by subsection A of this section.


C. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to monitor


compliance with the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-311 EB 1/19/2025 5:37:43 AM

























Req. No. 311 Page 2